Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF106.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $750,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $750,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Neighbors, Inc. to provide social services outreach, trainings, capacity building, support services, programming, and administrative support. new text end